District of Columbia statutes.
9-1117.03

Exclusive jurisdiction over vehicles; governing laws and procedures.

All vehicles and their contents towed or removed from the Potomac River bridges pursuant to this Compact shall be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the place to which such vehicle and its contents are taken, and the handling and disposition of such vehicle and its contents shall be governed by the laws and procedures of that jurisdiction.

History

March 31, 2000, D.C. Law 13-63, § 4, 46 DCR 9217

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) authorization of the District to remove disabled vehicles from any portion of the Potomac River Bridges, see notes following § 9-1117.01.